Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5682.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 7-6.2 of the General Laws entitled "Workers' Cooperatives" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
7-6.2-3.1. Corporations organized for the purpose of furnishing skilled labor.
A corporation electing to be governed as a workers' cooperative, may in its articles of
incorporation or bylaws, indicate its intent to be so governed, for the purpose of furnishing skilled
labor through its members performing contract labor for other entities; provided that, any individual
performing said labor does so under circumstances that demonstrate that the individual's
relationship to the contracting entity, is one of an independent contractor, furnishing skilled labor
through the workers' cooperative corporation.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000872
========